Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
MONUMENTS AND MEMORIALS

[§6E-31] Monuments; reservation of land;
relinquishment of private claims. Upon the recommendation of the
department, the governor may declare by public proclamation historic landmarks,
historic and prehistoric structures, and other objects of historic or
scientific interest that are situated upon the lands owned or controlled by the
State to be state monuments and may reserve as a part thereof parcels of land
the limits of which in all cases shall be confined to the smallest area
compatible with the proper care and management of the objects to be protected.
When such objects are situated upon a tract covered by a bona fide unperfected
claim or held in private ownership, the tract, or so much thereof as may be
necessary for the proper care and management of the object, may be relinquished
to the State, and the governor may accept the relinquishment of such tracts in
behalf of the State. [L 1976, c 104, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next